Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 61
OPPORTUNITIES FOR COLLEGES AND CAREER READY STUDENTS

Section.

33-6101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the state board of education.

“College and career readiness score” means the minimum score on a college entrance examination indicating that a student is academically ready to advance to an institution of higher education or to an occupation or occupational training, as determined by the board.

“College entrance examination” means the ACT, the SAT, or a similar examination identified by the board.

“Participation portfolio” means a description of a student’s nonacademic and cocurricular activities including, but not limited to, student government, sports, music ensembles, theater, clubs, organizations, work, internships, and volunteering. A participation portfolio should also include any leadership positions a student holds in nonacademic activities.

33-6102. Flexible schedule.

A student is eligible to take a flexible schedule as provided in subsection (2) of this section if the student:

Is at least sixteen (16) years of age;

Maintains a cumulative 3.5 grade point average;

Obtains permission from a parent or guardian, if under the age of eighteen (18) years;

Achieves a college and career readiness score;

Files with the student’s school:

Notification of the student’s intent to take a flexible schedule;

The student’s participation portfolio; and

An essay of at least one (1) page explaining why the student wishes to have a flexible schedule and outlining the student’s future plans using such flexible schedule; and

Completes:

The civics requirement in section 33-1602, Idaho Code; and

The economics credit, government credits, and senior project required under the board’s graduation requirements, provided that the student’s senior project may describe the student’s experience in achieving a college and career readiness score and include a detailed explanation of the student’s future plans.

An eligible student may, at the student’s option and upon notification to the student’s school, be relieved from completing any remaining high school graduation requirements. Such student shall have flexibility in the student’s schedule to:

Take elective courses, career technical education programs, or core courses as selected by the student and determined to be available by the student’s school district or public charter school;

Participate in apprenticeships or internships;

Act as a tutor at any grade level; or

Engage in such other activities as identified by the board.

A student with a flexible schedule must adhere to the plans described pursuant to subsection (1) (e) of this section. If the student is under the age of eighteen (18) years, the student’s plans may be modified with the approval of the student’s parent or guardian.

33-6103. Flexible schedule — Advanced opportunities funding.

A student who opts for a flexible schedule pursuant to the provisions of section 33-6102, Idaho Code, may use the student’s allotment of advanced opportunities funds for activities identified in subsection (2)(a) of that section.

33-6104. Early graduation.

A student is eligible to graduate early as provided in subsection (2) of this section if the student:

Is at least sixteen (16) years of age;

Maintains a cumulative 3.5 grade point average;

Obtains permission from a parent or guardian, if under the age of eighteen (18) years;

Achieves a college and career readiness score;

Files with the student’s school:

Notification of the student’s intent to graduate early;

The student’s participation portfolio; and

An essay of at least one (1) page explaining why the student wishes to graduate early and outlining the student’s future education or training plans if the student graduates early; and

Completes:

The civics requirement in section 33-1602, Idaho Code; and

The economics credit, government credits, and senior project required under the board’s graduation requirements, provided that the student’s senior project may describe the student’s experience in achieving a college and career readiness score and include a detailed explanation of the student’s future plans.

An eligible student may, at the student’s option and upon notification to the student’s school, be relieved from completing any remaining high school graduation requirements and graduate early.

School districts or public charter schools must grant high school diplomas to students who are eligible and opt for early graduation pursuant to this section.

33-6105. Duties of board.

The board shall:

Perform duties specifically provided in this chapter;

Ensure, through rules established by the board, that any funds distributed pursuant to section 33-6103, Idaho Code, are used for the purpose described in that section; and

Take such actions as are necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter, including the promulgation of any necessary rules.